District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-1812.03

Examination of books and witnesses; failure to obey summons or permit examination; prosecutions.

Repealed.

History

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 352, ch. 258, art. I, title XII, § 3
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(a), (b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, 573, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a), (c)(51)
Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-158, § 4, 25 DCR 7002
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(w), 48 DCR 334

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-1812.3.
1973 Ed., § 47-1586b.

Editor's Notes

Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”